Maine, session 132, LD1628.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §3015 is enacted to read:
§3015. Regulation of exterior lights
A municipality may adopt an ordinance to regulate an exterior light to prevent the
brilliance or positioning of the exterior light from causing undue annoyance or otherwise
adversely affecting the health or safety of a member of the public or the enjoyment or use
of another property, including requiring the exterior light to be positioned to shine
downward or otherwise be directed away from the public or another property or be
equipped with a shield to narrow the beam of light projected by the exterior light.